apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="зас/іб__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обу</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>обу</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обові</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>іб</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обі</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обе</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обом</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>іб</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обів</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обам</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оби</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обах</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оби</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>обами</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оби</l>
          <r>іб<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дерев/о__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>і</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="пров/ід__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оду</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>оду</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одові</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ід</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оді</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оде</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одом</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ід</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одів</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одам</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оди</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одах</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оди</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>одами</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оди</l>
          <r>ід<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="клоп/іт__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оту</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>оту</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отові</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>іт</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оті</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оте</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отом</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>іт</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отів</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отам</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оти</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отах</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оти</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>отами</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оти</l>
          <r>іт<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="засіб"><i>зас</i><par n="зас/іб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дерево"><i>дерев</i><par n="дерев/о__n"/></e>
    <e lm="провід"><i>пров</i><par n="пров/ід__n"/></e>
    <e lm="паропровід"><i>паропров</i><par n="пров/ід__n"/></e>
    <e lm="електропривід"><i>електроприв</i><par n="пров/ід__n"/></e>
    <e lm="небозвід"><i>небозв</i><par n="пров/ід__n"/></e>
    <e lm="клопіт"><i>клоп</i><par n="клоп/іт__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гавкіт"><i>гавк</i><par n="клоп/іт__n"/></e>
